DI-75

DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLESTABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &

BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DIAGNOSTIC TROUBLE CODE CHART

NOTICE:
When removing the part, turn the ignition switch OFF.
HINT:
e UsingSST 09843 -18020, connecttheterminals TcandE ofthe check connector.
. Ifany abnormality is notfound wheninspecting parts, inspectthe ECU.
. Ifamalfunction codeis displayed during the DTC check, check the circuit listed for that code. For de-
tails of each code, turn to the page referred to under the "See page” for respective "DTC No.” in the

DI6X1-06

DTC chart.
DTC chart of ABS:
DTC No. )
Detection ltem Trouble Area
(See Page)
C0278/ 11 Onk Hort circuitiri ABS Solefoid rélav circuit: * ABS salenqidrelawy
. pen or shortcircuitin Solenoid rélay circui « ABS solenoid relay circuit
C0279/12 . . o * ABS solenoidrelay
B+ short circuit in ABS solenoid relay circuit . o
] « ABS solenoid relay circuit
C0226/21 Open or shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit « Hydraulicbrake booster
0 (SFRcircuit) * SFRR or SFRH circuit
C0236/22 Open or shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit * Hydraulic brake booster
0 (SFLcircuit) ¢ SFLRor SFLH circuit
C0246/23 Openor shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit * Hydraulic brake booster
0 (SRRcircuit) * SRRR or SRRH circuit
C0256/24 Open or shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit ¢ Hydraulic brake booster
0 (SRLcircuit) * SRLRor SRLH circuit
C1225/25 Open or shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit ¢ Hydraulic brake booster
0 (SA1 circuit) * SA1 circuit
C1226/26 Openor shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit * Hydraulic brake booster
0 (SA2circuit) ¢ SA2circuit
C1227/27 Openor shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster * Hydraulic brake booster
0 solenoid circuit (SA3 circuit) * SA3circuit
C1228/28 Open or shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit ¢ Hydraulic brake booster
0 (STRcircuit) « STRcircuit
* Right front spee~c sensor
C0200/31% | . o o 9 ¢ S
(DI-79) Rightfrontwheel speed sensor signal malfunction * Speed sensor circuit
* Sensor rotor
1 « Leftfrontspeed sensor
C0205/32* . . P -
(DI-79) Left front wheel speed sensor signal malfunction » Speed sensor circuit
* Sensor rotor
1 ¢ Rightrear speedsensor
C0210/33* | _ . _ N peedsel
(DI-79) Right rear wheel speed sensor signal malfunction  Speed sensor circuit
* Sensor rotor
C0215/34% 1 . . e Leftrearspeed §en§or
(DI-79) Left rear wheel speed sensor signal malfunction * Speed sensor circuit
* Sensorrotor
C1235/35 . . . . ¢ Rightfront speed sensor
Foreign matter is attached on the tip of the right front sensor
(DI-79) * Speed sensor rotor
C1236/ 36 . . . e Leftfrontspeed sensor
Foreign matter is attached on the tip of the left front sensor
(DI-79) * Speed sensor rotor
C1237/37 o . ) .
B Some tire is different size from the other tires Tire size
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C1238/38 Forel ter Is attached on the tib of the riaht ¢ Right rear speed sensor
reign matter n r rear sensor
(DI-79) oreign matter is attached on the tip of the right rear senso « Speed sensor rotor
C1239/39 . . . e Left rear speed sensor
Foreign matter is attached on the tip of the left rear sensor
(DI-79) * Speed sensor rotor
* Batter
C1241/ 41 _ y
. Low battery voltage or abnormally high battery voltage «IC regulator
* Power source circuit
2 * Batter
C1242/ 42* N - ¢
B Open circuit in G2 circuit «IC regulator
* Power source circuit
C1243/43 L . * Deceleration sensor
Malfunction in deceleration sensor (constant output) j )
0 *Wire harness for deceleration sensor system
C1244 / 44 o . o ¢ Deceleration sensor
Open or short circuit in deceleration sensor circuit ) .
O * Deceleration sensor circuit
C1245/ 45 L . * Deceleration sensor
Malfunction in deceleration sensor j )
0 *Wire harness for deceleration sensor system
C1246/ 46 L . * Master cylinder pressure sensor
Malfunction in master cylinder pressure sensor ) —
0 * Master cylinder pressure sensor circuit
C1249/ 49 o ) ) o ) ) o
. Open circuit in stop light switch circuit Stop light switch circuit

2
C1251/51*

Pump motor is locked

Hydraulic brake booster pump motor

0 Open circuit in pump motor ground
C1252/ 52*2 * Hydraulic brake booster pump motor
B Hydraulic brake booster pump motor malfunction * Hydraulic brake booster pump motor circuit
* Pressure switch (PH or PL)
C1253/ 53*2 * ABS motor 1 or ABS motor 2 relay
. Hydraulic brake booster pump motor relay malfunction * ABS motor 1 or ABS motor 2 relay circuit
» Hydraulic brake booster pump motor circuit
2
C1254 / 54* . . ¢ Pressure switch (PH or PL)
Pressure switch malfunction . -
0 * Pressure switch circuit
C1256 56*2 * Accumulator
- Accumulator low pressure malfunction * Pressure switch (PH or PL)
* Hydraulic brake booster pump motor
C1257 /57 " Battery
. Power supply drive circuit malfunction e Power source circuit
« Skid control ECU
C1203 /59 * TRC+ or TRC- circuit
. Engine and ECT ECU communication circuit malfunction *ENG+ or ENG- circuit
¢ Engine and ECT ECU
C1268/68 . . L . * Transfer L4 position switch
Transfer L4 position signal transmission failure . . o
0 « Transfer L4 position switch circuit
* Battery
Always ON L . «|Cregulator
Malfunction in skid control ECU -
0 * Power source circuit

 Skid control ECU

*: Asthe DTC cannotbe erased by replacing parts alone do either of the following operations.

Clearthe DTC (see Pub.No. RM970E, page DI

-185).

At a vehicle speed of 20 km/h (12 mph), drive the vehicle for 30 seconds or more.
"1:Refer to LAND CRUISER Repair Manual Pub. No. RM970E
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2
* :Usingthefollowing table, troubled parts can be specified.

DTC 42 51 52 53 54 56 57
BRAKE Warning ||ght andbuzzer Light Buzzer LightBuzzer| LightBuzzer LightBuzzer LightBuzzer LightBuzzer LighBuzzer|
O O O 0 O
Pressure switch PH
PL O U O U U
Pump motor bpu gt 0|y
Pump motor circuit MTT wire harness
MT+ wire harness 0
MT- wire harness 0
Accumulator malfunction O|D
MR1 open circuit U
o MR2 open circuit -
Motor relay circuit 01l o 0
MR1 welded contact
MR2 welded contact Y -
Hydraulicbrake booster| Pressureleaks o (o oo
Power source* IG2 open circuit O
ECU Power supply circuit 0

*: When IG1 circuit is open, the ABS warning light and BRAKE warning light come
on.
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DTC chart of VSC:
DTC No. )
Detection ltem Trouble Area
(See Page)
C1231 /31 L . « Steering angle sensor
Malfunction in steering angle sensor . —
O « Steering angle sensor circuit
C1232/32 L . * Deceleration sensor
Malfunction in deceleration sensor . N
O * Deceleration sensor circuit
C1233/33 o o * Yaw rate sensor
Open or short circuit in yaw rate sensor circuit o
0  Yawrate sensor circuit
C1234 /34 L *Yawrate sensor
Malfunction in yaw rate sensor .
0 * Yaw rate sensor circuit
C1335/35 L . L o « Steering angle sensor
Malfunction in steering angle sensor communication circuit . L
O « Steering angle sensor circuit
* Yawrate sensor
C1210/36 o W o
. Zero point calibration of yaw rate sensor undone * Yaw rate sensor circuit
« Neutral start switch circuit (P range)
* Deceleration sensor
C1336/39 . N ) I .
. Zero point calibration of deceleration sensor * Deceleration sensor circuit
« Neutral start switch (P range) circuit
C1289/ 41* .
. Malfunction in VGRS control system VGRS control system
C1223 /43 .
B Malfunction in ABS control system ABS control system
*NEO circuit
C1224/44 o o Ociroui
- Open or short circuit in NE signal circuit *Engineand ECTECU
« Skid control ECU
C1340/ 47 o . . . « Center differential lock system
Open circuit in center differential lock signal . ) Lo
0 « Center differential lock circuit
*VSC+o0rVSC - circuit
C1291/ 48* I . . N P
. VGRS ECU communication circuit malfunction *AFS+orAFS - circuit
*EngineandECTECU
C1201 / 51 . . .
B Engine and ECT ECU system malfunction Engine control system
*TRC+orTRC - circuit
C1203/53 ) o . -
- Engineand ECT ECU communication circuit malfunction *ENG+0rENG - circuit
*Engineand ECTECU
C1290/ 66 ) L . « Steering angle sensor zero point calibration undone
Zero point calibration of steering sensor undone . I
(DI-87) * Yawrate sensor zero point calibrationundone
Always ON Malfunctionin skid control ECU » Power source circuit
0 Open circuitin VSC TRC warning light circuit «\VSC TRCwarninglightcircuit

*: w/ VGRS only

HINT:

Thereisacasethathand

-heldtester cannotbe used whenthe VSC TRC warning lightis always on.

"1:Refer to LAND CRUISER Repair Manual Pub. No. RM970E.
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